Washington statutes.
RCW 18.140.240

Commission/members—Duties and responsibilities.

The members of the real estate appraiser commission and its individual members shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

(1) To meet at the call of the director or upon its own initiative at the call of its chair or a majority of its members;

(2) To adopt a mission statement, and to serve as a liaison between appraisal practitioners, the public, and the department; and

(3) To study and recommend changes to this chapter to the director or to the legislature.

[ 2000 c 249 s 4.]